Missouri, session 2026, SB1520.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 250.234, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 250.234,
to read as follows:
250.234. Any user charges, connection fees, or other
charges levied by any city, town or village shall be due at
such time or times as specified by the governing board of
the city, town or village and shall, if not paid by the due
date, become delinquent and shall bear interest from the
date of delinquency until paid. If such charges become
delinquent they shall be a lien upon any land within the
corporate limits of the city, town or village so charged,
upon the governing board filing with the recorder of deeds
in the county where the land is situated a notice of
delinquency. The governing board shall file with the
recorder of deeds a similar notice when the delinquent
amounts, plus interest and any recording fees or attorneys'
fees, have been paid in full. The lien hereby created may
be enforced by suit [or foreclosure].
✓
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.